Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.900

Effective date—Application—1984 c 155.

This act shall take effect January 1, 1985. Any proceeding initiated before January 1, 1985, shall be governed by the law in effect on the date the proceeding was initiated.

[ 1984 c 155 s 41.]